Utah statutes.
53A-17a-105.5.   Flexibility in the use of program funds.

(1)  As used in this section, "qualifying program" means:

(a)  the at-risk flow through program created in Section 53A-17a-121;

(b)  the homeless and disadvantaged minority students program created in Section 53A-17a-121;

(c)  the gifted and talented program created in Section 53A-17a-120;

(d)  the advanced placement program created in Section 53A-15-101; and

(e)  the concurrent enrollment program created in Section 53A-15-101.

(2)  If a school district or charter school receives an allocation of state funds for a qualifying program that is less than $10,000, the school district or charter school may:

(a) (i)  combine the funds with one or more qualifying program fund allocations each of which is less than $10,000; and

(ii)  use the combined funds in accordance with the program requirements for any of the qualifying programs that are combined; or

(b) (i)  transfer the funds to a qualifying program for which the school district or charter school received an allocation of funds that is greater than or equal to $10,000; and

(ii)  use the combined funds in accordance with the program requirements for the qualifying program to which the funds are transferred.

